Maryland, session 2026, HB0954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–225.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Payment security” has the meaning stated in § 17–101 of this article.
(3) “Performance security” has the meaning stated in § 17–101 of this
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0954*

HOUSE BILL 954
article.
(b) (1) If a contractor has furnished 100% payment security and 100%
performance security in accordance with Title 17, Subtitle 1 of this article under a State
procurement contract for construction, the percentage specified in the contract for
retainage may not exceed 5% of the total amount.
(2) In addition to retainage, a primary procurement unit and the Maryland
Transportation Authority may withhold from payments otherwise due a contractor any
amount that the unit reasonably believes necessary to protect the State’s interest.
(3) Retainage withheld by a primary procurement unit and the Maryland
Transportation Authority may be deposited in an interest–bearing escrow account in
accordance with § 15–108 of this article.
(c) (1) A contractor may not retain a percentage of payments due a
subcontractor that exceeds the percentage of payments retained by the primary
procurement unit or the Maryland Transportation Authority.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection may not be construed to prohibit a
contractor from withholding any amount in addition to retainage if the contractor
determines that a subcontractor’s performance under the subcontract provides reasonable
grounds for withholding the additional amount.
(d) (1) A subcontractor may not retain a percentage of payments due a lower
tier subcontractor that exceeds the percentage of payments retained from the
subcontractor.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection may not be construed to prohibit a
subcontractor from withholding any amount in addition to retainage if the subcontractor
determines that a lower tier subcontractor’s performance under the subcontract provides
reasonable grounds for withholding the additional amount.
(e) UNDISPUTED RETENTION PROCEEDS RETAINED BY A UNIT OR A
CONTRACTOR UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE PAID WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE
DATE OF SUBSTANTIAL COMPLETION, AS DEFINED BY THE APPLICABLE CONTRACT
OR SUBCONTRACT.
(F) If retainage has been placed in escrow under § 15–108 of this article, each
payment of retainage shall include a pro rata portion of interest earned.
[(f)] (G) This section may not be construed to limit the application of the
provisions of Title 17, Subtitle 1 of this article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.

HOUSE BILL 954 3
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.